zh-TW: 電動車傳動系統配置: 雙馬達 (前 + 後); 雙馬達 (後 + 後); 四馬達; 單馬達 (前); 單馬達 (後); 三馬達; 其他
zh-CN: 电动车辆传动系统布局: 双电机（前置 + 后置）; 双电机（后置 + 后置）; 四电机; 单电机（前置）; 单电机（后置）; 三电机; 其他
de: Antriebslayout des Elektrofahrzeugs: Doppelmotor (vorne + hinten); Doppelmotor (hinten + hinten); Vierfachmotor; Einzelmotor (vorne); Einzelmotor (hinten); Dreifachmotor; Sonstige
pt-BR: Layout do sistema de transmissão de veículos elétricos: Motor duplo (dianteiro + traseiro); Motor duplo (traseiro + traseiro); Motor quádruplo; Motor único (dianteiro); Motor único (traseiro); Motor triplo; Outro
ro-RO: Aspectul sistemului de propulsie al vehiculului electric: Motor dual (față + spate); Motor dual (spate + spate); Patru motoare; Un singur motor (față); Un singur motor (spate); Trei motoare; Altele
pl: Układ napędowy pojazdu elektrycznego: Dwa silniki (przód + tył); Dwa silniki (tył + tył); Cztery silniki; Jeden silnik (przód); Jeden silnik (tył); Trzy silniki; Inne
fi: Sähköajoneuvon voimansiirtorakenne: Kaksoismoottori (etu + taka); Kaksoismoottori (taka + taka); Nelimoottori; Yksi moottori (etu); Yksi moottori (taka); Kolmimoottori; Muu
nb: Layout for elektriske kjøretøy: Dobbeltmotor (foran + bak); Dobbeltmotor (bak + bak); Firemotors; Enkeltmotor (foran); Enkeltmotor (bak); Tremotors; Annet
nl: Elektrisch voertuig aandrijflijn lay-out: Dubbele motor (voor + achter); Dubbele motor (achter + achter); Quad-motor; Enkele motor (voor); Enkele motor (achter); Tri-motor; Overige
ko: 전기차 구동계 구성: 듀얼 모터(전면 + 후면); 듀얼 모터(후면 + 후면); 쿼드 모터; 싱글 모터(전면); 싱글 모터(후면); 트라이 모터; 기타
bg-BG: Конфигурация на задвижването на електрическо превозно средство: Двоен двигател (преден + заден); Двоен двигател (заден + заден); Четири двигателя; Единичен двигател (преден); Единичен двигател (заден); Три двигателя; Други
tr: Elektrikli araç güç aktarma sistemi: Çift motor (ön + arka); Çift motor (arka + arka); Dört motor; Tek motor (ön); Tek motor (arka); Üç motor; Diğer
ja: 電気自動車のパワートレインレイアウト: デュアルモーター (フロント+リア); デュアルモーター (リア+リア); クアッドモーター; シングルモーター (フロント); シングルモーター (リア); トライモーター; その他
hu: Elektromos jármű hajtáslánc elrendezés: Kétmotoros (elöl + hátul); Kétmotoros (hátul + hátul); Négymotoros; Egymotoros (elöl); Egymotoros (hátul); Hárommotoros; Egyéb
cs: Rozvržení pohonu elektrického vozidla: Dva motory (vpředu a vzadu); Dva motory (vzadu a vzadu); Čtyři motory; Jeden motor (vpředu); Jeden motor (vzadu); Tři motory; Jiné
hr-HR: Izgled pogona električnog vozila: Dva motora (prednji + stražnji); Dva motora (stražnji + stražnji); Četiri motora; Jedan motor (prednji); Jedan motor (stražnji); Tri motora; Ostalo
en: Electric vehicle drivetrain layout: Dual motor (front + rear); Dual motor (rear + rear); Quad-motor; Single motor (front); Single motor (rear); Tri-motor; Other
sk-SK: Rozloženie hnacieho ústrojenstva elektrického vozidla: Dva motory (vpredu a vzadu); Dva motory (vzadu a vzadu); Štyri motory; Jeden motor (vpredu); Jeden motor (vzadu); Tri motory; Iné
da: Opbygning af drivlinjen i en elbil: To motorer (for + bag); To motorer (bag + bag); Fire motorer; Enkelt motor (for); Enkelt motor (bag); Tre motorer; Andet
fr: Agencement de la chaîne cinématique du véhicule électrique: Moteur double (avant + arrière); Moteur double (arrière + arrière); Quatre moteurs; Moteur simple (avant); Moteur simple (arrière); Trois moteurs; Autre
it: layoutdella trasmissione del veicolo elettrico: Doppio motore (anteriore + posteriore); Doppio motore (posteriore + posteriore); Quadrimotore; Motore singolo (anteriore); Motore singolo (posteriore); Trimotore; Altro
sv: Drivlinans layout för elfordon: Dubbla motorer (fram + bak); Dubbla motorer (bak + bak); Fyra motorer; Enkel motor (fram); Enkel motor (bak); Tre motorer; Övrigt
sl-SI: Postavitev pogona električnega vozila: Dvojni motor (spredaj in zadaj); Dvojni motor (zadaj in zadaj); Štirje motorji; Enojni motor (spredaj); Enojni motor (zadaj); Trije motorji; Drugo
lt-LT: Elektrinės transporto priemonės pavaros išdėstymas: Du varikliai (priekyje ir gale); Du varikliai (abu gale); Keturi varikliai; Vienas variklis (priekyje); Vienas variklis (gale); Trys varikliai; Kita
ru: Компоновка трансмиссии электромобиля: Два мотора (спереди и сзади); Два мотора (оба сзади); Четыре мотора; Один мотор (спереди); Один мотор (сзади); Три мотора; Другое
th: รูปแบบการวางระบบขับเคลื่อนของรถยนต์ไฟฟ้า: มอเตอร์คู่ (หน้า + หลัง); มอเตอร์คู่ (หลัง + หลัง); มอเตอร์ 4 ตัว; มอเตอร์เดี่ยว (หน้า); มอเตอร์เดี่ยว (หลัง); มอเตอร์ 3 ตัว; อื่นๆ
es: Diseño de la transmisión de vehículos eléctricos.: Motor doble (delantero + trasero); Motor doble (trasero + trasero); Motor cuádruple; Motor simple (delantero); Motor simple (trasero); Motor triple; Otro
vi: Sơ đồ bố trí hệ thống truyền động xe điện: Động cơ kép (trước + sau); Động cơ kép (sau + sau); Bốn động cơ; Động cơ đơn (trước); Động cơ đơn (sau); Ba động cơ; Khác
el: Διάταξη συστήματος μετάδοσης κίνησης ηλεκτρικού οχήματος: Διπλός κινητήρας (μπροστά + πίσω); Διπλός κινητήρας (πίσω + πίσω); Τετραπλός κινητήρας; Μονός κινητήρας (μπροστά); Μονός κινητήρας (πίσω); Τριπλός κινητήρας; Άλλο
pt-PT: Esquema de transmissão de veículos elétricos: Motor duplo (dianteiro + traseiro); Motor duplo (traseiro + traseiro); Quatro motores; Motor único (dianteiro); Motor único (traseiro); Três motores; Outro